Kentucky statutes. TITLE IV Judicial Branch
Criminal Justice Statistics

27A.300.
Duties of Administrative Office of the Courts in regard to centralized criminal history record information system.

The Administrative Office of the Courts shall, in cooperation with the Department of Kentucky State Police, the Department of Juvenile Justice, the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, and the Department of Corrections, be responsible for the recording of those data elements that are needed for development of the centralized criminal history record information system.

The database shall at a minimum contain the information contained in KRS

27A.310

to

27A.440

.

The Administrative Office of the Courts shall provide access to the Department of Kentucky State Police, the Department of Juvenile Justice, the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, and the Department of Corrections to its database.

The Administrative Office of the Courts shall, where the number is known, assign the same identification number or other variable to each person whose name appears in the database.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 389, § 2, effective July 15, 1986; 1992, ch. 211, § 8, effective July 14, 1992; 1998, ch. 606, § 16, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 100, effective June 20, 2005; 2007, ch. 85, § 113, effective June 26, 2007.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/26/2007). The numbering of subsections in this section has been altered by the Reviser of Statutes from the numbering in 2007 Ky. Acts ch. 85, sec. 113, under the authority of KRS

7.136

.

27A.302.
New or updated software to allow redesignation as misdemeanor if felony case concludes with only misdemeanor conviction.

The Administrative Office of the Courts shall require that any updates to or replacements of the centralized criminal history record information system established by this chapter or any case management software utilized in the offices of the Commonwealth’s circuit clerks have the capability for those felony cases that reach final disposition with a conviction for a misdemeanor only to be redesignated with the same type of case designators as those used for cases that are initiated as misdemeanor cases.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 89, § 5, effective March 22, 2013.

27A.305.
Collection of statistical data concerning sexual offenses.

The Administrative Office of the Courts shall collect statistical data regarding the prosecution, dismissal, conviction, or acquittal of any person charged with committing, attempting to commit, or complicity to a sexual offense as defined by KRS

510.040

,

510.050

,

510.060

,

510.070

,

510.080

,

510.090

,

510.110

,

510.120

,

510.130

,

510.140

,

530.020

, 530.064(1)(a), and

531.310

.

The information collected pursuant to this section for the previous calendar year shall be provided by May 1 of 2018 and by each May 1 thereafter to the Sexual Assault Response Team Advisory Committee as defined in KRS

403.707

.

HISTORY:

2016 ch. 58, § 7, effective April 8, 2016.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(4/8/2016). 2016 Ky. Acts ch. 58, sec. 11 provided that that Act shall be known as the Sexual Assault Forensic Evidence (SAFE) Act of 2016. This statute was created in Section 7 of that Act.

27A.310.
Seven levels of information for centralized criminal history record information system.

The centralized criminal history record information system shall consist of a minimum of seven (7) levels of information as follows:

Information relating to the offender;

Information relating to the arrest;

Information relating to the prosecution and action by the grand jury (when the case is brought before the grand jury) action upon the case;

Information relating to the court disposition of the case;

Information relating to sentencing;

Information relating to the handling of the offender if he is received by a correctional or other institution; and

Programs and information designed to enable the General Assembly, executive branch agencies, and others to assess the efficiency, functioning, and other aspects of the operation of the criminal justice system.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 389, § 7, effective July 15, 1986.

27A.320.
Offender level.

The offender level of the system shall consist of at least the following information:

Name of the offender, including other names by which he is known;

Date of birth;

Sex;

Race;

Ethnic origin;

Residence address at time of arrest; and

Personal identification number.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 389, § 8, effective July 15, 1986.

27A.330.
Arrest level.

The arrest level of the system shall consist of at least the following information:

Name of offender, together with personal identification number (if known);

Arresting agency;

Date, place and time of offense;

Number of arrest charges;

Listing of arrest charges by name, KRS number and citation number;

Charge sequence and incident number;

Level of arrest charged or degree of offense charged;

Date, time, and place of arrest;

If a theft or criminal damage to property offense, the dollar amount of property damaged or stolen;

Exact disposition of the case by police following arrest; and

Date of disposition of the case by the police.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 389, § 9, effective July 15, 1986.

27A.340.
Prosecution/grand jury level.

The prosecution/grand jury level of the system shall consist of at least the following information:

Listing of each charged offense by name and KRS number;

Level of offense charged or degree of offense charged for each offense in subsection (1) of this section;

Number of charged offenses;

If the case was disposed of by the prosecutor, the nature of such disposition and the date of such disposition;

A listing of the charges disposed of in subsection (4) of this section;

A correlation of the number of offenses charged at arrest and the number of offenses brought before the grand jury, offense by offense;

Listing of each charged offense, and the level thereof, brought before the grand jury;

Listing of the disposition of each charged offense brought before the grand jury;

Date of indictment;

Listing of each charged offense, and the level thereof, for which the offender was indicted;

Listing of the number of criminal complaints brought before the prosecutor by written complaint, the offense alleged, and the disposition thereof; and

Listing of the number of criminal complaints sought by citizens upon which no action was taken by the prosecutor, the offense alleged, and the date of disposition.

All data required by this section shall be supplied to the circuit clerk by each Commonwealth’s and county attorney, if it is not already in the possession of the clerk.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 389, § 10, effective July 15, 1986.

27A.350.
Court disposition level relating to arraignment.

The court disposition level of the system shall consist of at least the following information as relates to the arraignment:

The court which disposed of the offense;

The name of the judge presiding at the time of disposition;

Date of arraignment;

Listing of each charged offense, and the level thereof, brought before the court at the arraignment;

Listing of the disposition of each charged offense, and the level thereof disposed of by the court at the arraignment; and

Defendant’s plea to each offense at the arraignment.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 389, § 11, effective July 15, 1986.

27A.360.
Court disposition level relating to bond and pretrial release.

The court disposition level of the system shall consist of at least the following information as relates to bond and pretrial release:

Whether or not the defendant was released on bail or pretrial release;

If released on bail:

The amount of the bail;

Whether the bail was cash, property, a percentage of cash bail, secured, unsecured, or otherwise;

Whether the conditions of bail were satisfied; and

Whether or not the bail was returned, forfeited, credited to the public advocate or otherwise;

If released on any other form of pretrial release:

Whether or not released on own recognizance;

Whether release was upon conditions, if so what conditions; and

Whether the conditions of release were satisfied.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 389, § 12, effective July 15, 1986.

27A.370.
Court disposition level relating to counsel.

The court disposition level of the system shall consist of at least the following information as relates to counsel:

Did the defendant have counsel;

Did the defendant retain private counsel;

Was counsel provided by the public advocate;

If counsel was provided by the public advocate:

Was reimbursement sought;

What was the amount of reimbursement sought;

What was the amount of reimbursement paid; and

What amount was recovered from bail money;

Did the defendant have more than one (1) counsel; if so, the number of counsel.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 389, § 13, effective July 15, 1986.

27A.380.
Court disposition level relating to type of trial.

The court disposition level of the system shall consist of at least the following information as relates to the type of trial:

Jury trial; or

Trial before the judge.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 389, § 14, effective July 15, 1986.

27A.390.
Court disposition level relating to offenses charged and offenses disposed of.

The court disposition level of the system shall consist of at least the following information as relates to the offenses charged and the offenses disposed of:

The court which disposed of the offense;

The name of the presiding judge;

Date upon which the trial began;

The final pleading, as to each charged offense and the level thereof;

Listing of charged offenses disposed of by the court together with:

Date of disposition;

Listing of each offense and the KRS number, name and level;

Whether the offense was dismissed in exchange for a guilty plea on another offense; and

Number of offenses disposed of by the court;

Listing of offenses for which the defendant was convicted by KRS number, name and level;

Number of convicted offenses; and

Date of conviction.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 389, § 15, effective July 15, 1986.

27A.400.
Sentencing level relating to sentence imposed.

The sentencing level of the system shall consist of at least the following information as relates to the sentence imposed:

Sentencing date;

Sentence for each offense;

If sentenced to imprisonment:

Place of imprisonment;

Sentence minimum for each offense;

Sentence maximum for each offense;

Consecutive multiple incarceration;

Concurrent multiple incarceration;

Was the defendant sentenced without privilege of parole for twenty-five (25) years; and

If answer to paragraph (f) of this subsection is yes, which aggravating circumstance or circumstances were found;

If sentenced to a fine:

The amount of the fine;

Is the fine to be paid in installments;

If answer to paragraph (b) of this subsection is yes, amount of each installment;

Was the fine paid in full upon conviction;

If not, what amount was paid; and

How much of money held for bail was used in payment of the fine;

If any other sentence was imposed:

The nature of the sentence;

Was conditional discharge imposed and what were the conditions of the discharge;

Was restitution imposed;

If restitution was imposed, what were the conditions of restitution;

If monetary restitution was imposed, what was the amount;

Was the amount paid in full upon conviction;

If restitution was to be paid in installments, what is the amount of each installment and to whom is it to be paid; and

List any other type of sentence imposed;

Were court costs imposed:

The amount of the costs;

Are the costs to be paid in installments;

If answer to paragraph (b) of this subsection is yes, the amount of each installment;

Were the costs paid in full upon conviction; and

If not, how much was paid;

Was a crime victim compensation fund cost imposed:

The amount imposed;

Is this amount to be paid in installments;

If answer to paragraph (b) of this subsection is yes, the amount of each installment;

Was the crime victim compensation fund cost paid in full upon conviction; and

If not, how much was paid;

List all other fees, costs, and similar monetary penalties which were imposed but not listed above:

List separately the amount of each;

List separately each to be paid in installments;

List separately the amount of each installment;

Were these costs paid in full upon conviction; list each; and

If not, list the amount paid on each.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 389, § 16, effective July 15, 1986.

27A.410.
Sentencing level relating to probation or other nonimposition of sentence.

The sentencing level of the system shall consist of at least the following information in regard to probation or other nonimposition of the sentence:

List separately any conviction for which sentence was imposed but was probated, suspended, or otherwise not imposed;

Was probation or nonimposition of the sentence conditioned in any manner:

List the conditions; and

What is the method of monitoring compliance with the conditions;

If a portion of a fine or other cost was probated or otherwise not imposed:

List for each offense the amount of the fine not imposed; and

List for each offense the amount of court costs or other costs or fees not imposed;

If a sentence of imprisonment was not imposed or a portion thereof was not imposed:

List the offense, the sentence, and the amount not imposed; and

If return to confinement or other imprisonment was a condition of nonimposition of a sentence, list the conditions thereof.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 389, § 17, effective July 15, 1986.

27A.420.
Sentencing level relating to plea bargaining.

The sentencing level of the system shall consist of at least the following information in regard to plea bargaining:

Did the defendant plead guilty to any offense in exchange for a lesser penalty or in exchange for dropping other charges against him;

If the answer to subsection (1) of this section is yes:

What offenses and levels of offense was a guilty plea accepted to; list each separately; and

What offenses and levels of offense were dismissed in exchange for a plea of guilty; list each separately;

What punishment was imposed for each offense for which a plea of guilty was accepted in exchange for a lesser penalty or in exchange for dropping charges:

Imprisonment; list offense and term of imprisonment for each offense separately; and

Fine; list offense, and amount of fine for each offense separately;

Was probation, suspended sentence or any other nonimposition of sentence imposed for any offense where a plea of guilty was made in exchange for a lesser penalty or in exchange for dropping other charges:

Describe each separately; and

Describe any conditions placed upon each; list separately.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 389, § 18, effective July 15, 1986.

27A.430.
Institutional level.

The institutional level of the system shall consist of at least the following information:

Date of institutionalization;

Type of incoming action;

If defendant sentenced to death:

First scheduled date of execution;

Date defendant executed;

Date sentence commuted in lieu of execution;

Sentence to which sentence of death was commuted;

Date defendant released from institution;

Type of release from institution;

If the offender is released on parole:

Offense for which convicted;

Maximum expiration date;

Minimum expiration date;

Was the parole supervision fee imposed;

What was the amount actually imposed for the parole supervision fee;

What amount of the parole supervision fee was actually collected;

Was restitution ordered as part of conditions of the parole;

What amount of restitution was ordered;

What amount of restitution has been paid;

Was a victim impact statement presented to the parole board; did it favor the release of the offender;

Did the prosecutor present a statement to the parole board; did it favor the release of the offender; and

Did the victim or a representative of the victim appear before the parole board; did he favor the release of the offender;

If the offender released on parole violates parole or is rearrested:

What was the specific parole violation;

Was the offender arrested for the violation;

What was the outcome of the parole violation hearing;

Was the offender reinstitutionalized;

If arrested for a new criminal offense, list the KRS number, name, and level of the offense;

Was the offender subsequently convicted thereof;

Was the offender reinstitutionalized for the offense; and

Was the offender placed on probation for the offense.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 389, § 19, effective July 15, 1986.

27A.440.
Informational and evaluational level.

The informational and evaluational level of the system shall consist of at least the following information:

KRS numbers, names and levels of offenses;

Updates of information on:

Payment of fines;

Payment of costs;

Payment of restitution amounts;

Payment of court-ordered monetary penalties other than the above; and

Satisfaction of other types of court-ordered restitution;

Cases in which shock probation has been granted:

In such cases all information required for KRS

27A.410

and

27A.420

shall be entered for each case as an update to that person’s file; and

Extracted data on shock probation shall be placed in the annual report of the Administrative Office of the Courts.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 389, § 20, effective July 15, 1986.

27A.450.
Information submitted by circuit clerk a public record open to public inspection — Subject of record to have access to all records relating to himself — Limitation.

Information submitted by the circuit clerk to the Administrative Office of the Courts shall be a public record and shall be open to public inspection pursuant to KRS Chapter 61. KRS

17.150

excludes centralized criminal history records from public inspection; however, the subject of a record contained in that system shall have access to records relating to himself, subject to limitations set forth in KRS

17.150

and federal regulations.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 389, § 21, effective July 15, 1986.

27A.455.
Access to records by Department of Juvenile Justice.

The Department of Juvenile Justice shall have access to all court records, active and closed, relating to or in the custody of the juvenile session of the District Court or the Administrative Office of the Courts, or both.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 606, § 15, effective July 15, 1998.

27A.460.
Annual report of Administrative Office of the Courts.

The Administrative Office of the Courts shall issue an annual report beginning calendar year 1987 with sufficient detail as to be able to identify, on a county-by-county basis as well as statewide totals, for felony arrest:

Conviction percentages;

Percentages of fines, imprisonment, or other penalty assessment;

Percentage of acquittals;

Percentage of dismissals;

Percentage of pleas as charges;

Percentage of pleas to reduce charges;

Percentage of disposition to guilty as charged by trial;

Percentage of those found guilty of lesser charge by trial;

Percentage of cases where jury trial taken;

Percentage of trials which are bench trials; and

The number of juvenile offenders tried as an adult.

The information gathered shall be available to all agencies involved in the criminal justice system and the public.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 389, § 22, effective July 15, 1986.

27A.470.
Administrative Office of the Courts annual report and Kentucky Uniform Crime Report may be combined.

The Administrative Office of the Courts may combine its annual report in KRS

27A.460

with the Kentucky Uniform Crime Report.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 389, § 23, effective July 15, 1986; 2011, ch. 2, § 66, effective June 8, 2011.